fi_FI.aff
SFX X   vä    isiköhän    [^ä]ävä
SFX X   vä    isimmekin   [^ä]ävä
SFX X   vä    isimmekö    [^ä]ävä
SFX X   vä    isimmekään  [^ä]ävä
SFX X   vä    isimmehän   [^ä]ävä
SFX X   vä    isimmepä    [^ä]ävä
SFX X   vä    isimmeköhän [^ä]ävä
SFX X   vä    isittekin   [^ä]ävä
SFX X   vä    isittekö    [^ä]ävä
SFX X   vä    isittekään  [^ä]ävä
SFX X   vä    isittehän   [^ä]ävä
SFX X   vä    isittepä    [^ä]ävä
SFX X   vä    isitteköhän [^ä]ävä
SFX X   vä    isivätkin   [^ä]ävä
SFX X   vä    isivätkö    [^ä]ävä
SFX X   vä    isivätkään  [^ä]ävä
SFX X   vä    isiväthän   [^ä]ävä
SFX X   vä    isivätpä    [^ä]ävä
SFX X   vä    isivätköhän [^ä]ävä
SFX X   evä   isin        [^ei]evä
SFX X   evä   isit        [^ei]evä
SFX X   evä   isi         [^ei]evä
SFX X   evä   isimme      [^ei]evä
SFX X   evä   isitte      [^ei]evä
SFX X   evä   isivät      [^ei]evä
SFX X   evä   isinkin     [^ei]evä
SFX X   evä   isinkö      [^ei]evä
SFX X   evä   isinkään    [^ei]evä
SFX X   evä   isinhän     [^ei]evä
SFX X   evä   isinpä      [^ei]evä
SFX X   evä   isinköhän   [^ei]evä
SFX X   evä   isitkin     [^ei]evä
SFX X   evä   isitkö      [^ei]evä
SFX X   evä   isitkään    [^ei]evä
SFX X   evä   isithän     [^ei]evä
SFX X   evä   isitpä      [^ei]evä
SFX X   evä   isitköhän   [^ei]evä
SFX X   evä   isikin      [^ei]evä
SFX X   evä   isikö       [^ei]evä
SFX X   evä   isikään     [^ei]evä
SFX X   evä   isihän      [^ei]evä
SFX X   evä   isipä       [^ei]evä
SFX X   evä   isiköhän    [^ei]evä
SFX X   evä   isimmekin   [^ei]evä
SFX X   evä   isimmekö    [^ei]evä
SFX X   evä   isimmekään  [^ei]evä
SFX X   evä   isimmehän   [^ei]evä
SFX X   evä   isimmepä    [^ei]evä
SFX X   evä   isimmeköhän [^ei]evä
SFX X   evä   isittekin   [^ei]evä
SFX X   evä   isittekö    [^ei]evä
SFX X   evä   isittekään  [^ei]evä
SFX X   evä   isittehän   [^ei]evä
SFX X   evä   isittepä    [^ei]evä
SFX X   evä   isitteköhän [^ei]evä
SFX X   evä   isivätkin   [^ei]evä
SFX X   evä   isivätkö    [^ei]evä
SFX X   evä   isivätkään  [^ei]evä
SFX X   evä   isiväthän   [^ei]evä
SFX X   evä   isivätpä    [^ei]evä
SFX X   evä   isivätköhän [^ei]evä
SFX X   vä    sin         ivä
SFX X   vä    sit         ivä
SFX X   vä    si          ivä
SFX X   vä    simme       ivä
SFX X   vä    sitte       ivä
SFX X   vä    sivät       ivä
SFX X   vä    sinkin      ivä
SFX X   vä    sinkö       ivä
SFX X   vä    sinkään     ivä
SFX X   vä    sinhän      ivä
SFX X   vä    sinpä       ivä
SFX X   vä    sinköhän    ivä
SFX X   vä    sitkin      ivä
SFX X   vä    sitkö       ivä
SFX X   vä    sitkään     ivä
SFX X   vä    sithän      ivä
SFX X   vä    sitpä       ivä
SFX X   vä    sitköhän    ivä
SFX X   vä    sikin       ivä
SFX X   vä    sikö        ivä
SFX X   vä    sikään      ivä
SFX X   vä    sihän       ivä
SFX X   vä    sipä        ivä
SFX X   vä    siköhän     ivä
SFX X   vä    simmekin    ivä
SFX X   vä    simmekö     ivä
SFX X   vä    simmekään   ivä
SFX X   vä    simmehän    ivä
SFX X   vä    simmepä     ivä
SFX X   vä    simmeköhän  ivä
SFX X   vä    sittekin    ivä
SFX X   vä    sittekö     ivä
SFX X   vä    sittekään   ivä
SFX X   vä    sittehän    ivä
SFX X   vä    sittepä     ivä
SFX X   vä    sitteköhän  ivä
SFX X   vä    sivätkin    ivä
SFX X   vä    sivätkö     ivä
SFX X   vä    sivätkään   ivä
SFX X   vä    siväthän    ivä
SFX X   vä    sivätpä     ivä
SFX X   vä    sivätköhän  ivä
SFX X   yövä  öisin       yövä
SFX X   yövä  öisit       yövä
SFX X   yövä  öisi        yövä
SFX X   yövä  öisimme     yövä
SFX X   yövä  öisitte     yövä
SFX X   yövä  öisivät     yövä
SFX X   yövä  öisinkin    yövä
SFX X   yövä  öisinkö     yövä
SFX X   yövä  öisinkään   yövä
SFX X   yövä  öisinhän    yövä
SFX X   yövä  öisinpä     yövä
SFX X   yövä  öisinköhän  yövä
SFX X   yövä  öisitkin    yövä
SFX X   yövä  öisitkö     yövä
SFX X   yövä  öisitkään   yövä
SFX X   yövä  öisithän    yövä
SFX X   yövä  öisitpä     yövä
SFX X   yövä  öisitköhän  yövä
SFX X   yövä  öisikin     yövä
SFX X   yövä  öisikö      yövä
SFX X   yövä  öisikään    yövä
SFX X   yövä  öisihän     yövä
SFX X   yövä  öisipä      yövä
SFX X   yövä  öisiköhän   yövä
SFX X   yövä  öisimmekin  yövä
SFX X   yövä  öisimmekö   yövä
SFX X   yövä  öisimmekään yövä
SFX X   yövä  öisimmehän  yövä
SFX X   yövä  öisimmepä   yövä
SFX X   yövä  öisimmeköhän yövä
SFX X   yövä  öisittekin  yövä
SFX X   yövä  öisittekö   yövä
SFX X   yövä  öisittekään yövä
SFX X   yövä  öisittehän  yövä
SFX X   yövä  öisittepä   yövä
SFX X   yövä  öisitteköhän yövä
SFX X   yövä  öisivätkin  yövä
SFX X   yövä  öisivätkö   yövä
SFX X   yövä  öisivätkään yövä
SFX X   yövä  öisiväthän  yövä
SFX X   yövä  öisivätpä   yövä
SFX X   yövä  öisivätköhän yövä
SFX X   vä    isin        [^öy]övä
SFX X   vä    isit        [^öy]övä
SFX X   vä    isi         [^öy]övä
SFX X   vä    isimme      [^öy]övä
SFX X   vä    isitte      [^öy]övä
SFX X   vä    isivät      [^öy]övä
SFX X   vä    isinkin     [^öy]övä
SFX X   vä    isinkö      [^öy]övä
SFX X   vä    isinkään    [^öy]övä
SFX X   vä    isinhän     [^öy]övä
SFX X   vä    isinpä      [^öy]övä
SFX X   vä    isinköhän   [^öy]övä
SFX X   vä    isitkin     [^öy]övä
SFX X   vä    isitkö      [^öy]övä
SFX X   vä    isitkään    [^öy]övä
SFX X   vä    isithän     [^öy]övä
SFX X   vä    isitpä      [^öy]övä
SFX X   vä    isitköhän   [^öy]övä
SFX X   vä    isikin      [^öy]övä
SFX X   vä    isikö       [^öy]övä
SFX X   vä    isikään     [^öy]övä
SFX X   vä    isihän      [^öy]övä
SFX X   vä    isipä       [^öy]övä
SFX X   vä    isiköhän    [^öy]övä
SFX X   vä    isimmekin   [^öy]övä
SFX X   vä    isimmekö    [^öy]övä
SFX X   vä    isimmekään  [^öy]övä
SFX X   vä    isimmehän   [^öy]övä
SFX X   vä    isimmepä    [^öy]övä
SFX X   vä    isimmeköhän [^öy]övä
SFX X   vä    isittekin   [^öy]övä
SFX X   vä    isittekö    [^öy]övä
SFX X   vä    isittekään  [^öy]övä
SFX X   vä    isittehän   [^öy]övä
SFX X   vä    isittepä    [^öy]övä
SFX X   vä    isitteköhän [^öy]övä
SFX X   vä    isivätkin   [^öy]övä
SFX X   vä    isivätkö    [^öy]övä
SFX X   vä    isivätkään  [^öy]övä
SFX X   vä    isiväthän   [^öy]övä
SFX X   vä    isivätpä    [^öy]övä
SFX X   vä    isivätköhän [^öy]övä
SFX X   vä    isin        [^y]yvä
SFX X   vä    isit        [^y]yvä
SFX X   vä    isi         [^y]yvä
SFX X   vä    isimme      [^y]yvä
SFX X   vä    isitte      [^y]yvä
SFX X   vä    isivät      [^y]yvä
SFX X   vä    isinkin     [^y]yvä
SFX X   vä    isinkö      [^y]yvä
SFX X   vä    isinkään    [^y]yvä
SFX X   vä    isinhän     [^y]yvä
SFX X   vä    isinpä      [^y]yvä
SFX X   vä    isinköhän   [^y]yvä
SFX X   vä    isitkin     [^y]yvä
SFX X   vä    isitkö      [^y]yvä
SFX X   vä    isitkään    [^y]yvä
SFX X   vä    isithän     [^y]yvä
SFX X   vä    isitpä      [^y]yvä
SFX X   vä    isitköhän   [^y]yvä
SFX X   vä    isikin      [^y]yvä
SFX X   vä    isikö       [^y]yvä
SFX X   vä    isikään     [^y]yvä
SFX X   vä    isihän      [^y]yvä
SFX X   vä    isipä       [^y]yvä
SFX X   vä    isiköhän    [^y]yvä
SFX X   vä    isimmekin   [^y]yvä
SFX X   vä    isimmekö    [^y]yvä
SFX X   vä    isimmekään  [^y]yvä
SFX X   vä    isimmehän   [^y]yvä
SFX X   vä    isimmepä    [^y]yvä
SFX X   vä    isimmeköhän [^y]yvä
SFX X   vä    isittekin   [^y]yvä
SFX X   vä    isittekö    [^y]yvä
SFX X   vä    isittekään  [^y]yvä
SFX X   vä    isittehän   [^y]yvä
SFX X   vä    isittepä    [^y]yvä
SFX X   vä    isitteköhän [^y]yvä
SFX X   vä    isivätkin   [^y]yvä
SFX X   vä    isivätkö    [^y]yvä
SFX X   vä    isivätkään  [^y]yvä
SFX X   vä    isiväthän   [^y]yvä
SFX X   vä    isivätpä    [^y]yvä
SFX X   vä    isivätköhän [^y]yvä
SFX X   ävä   i           [^äeiöyt]ävä
SFX X   ävä   ikin        [^äeiöyt]ävä
SFX X   ävä   ikö         [^äeiöyt]ävä
SFX X   ävä   ikään       [^äeiöyt]ävä
SFX X   ävä   ihän        [^äeiöyt]ävä
SFX X   ävä   ipä         [^äeiöyt]ävä
SFX X   ävä   iköhän      [^äeiöyt]ävä
SFX X   ävä   ivät        [^äeiöyt]ävä
SFX X   ävä   ivätkin     [^äeiöyt]ävä
SFX X   ävä   ivätkö      [^äeiöyt]ävä
